Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Article 4. Protection of Purchasers
§ 4-114.
Implied warranties of quality.

A declarant and any dealer warrant that a unit will be in at least as good condition at the time of the conveyance or delivery of possession, whichever is earlier, as it was at the time of contracting, reasonable wear and tear excepted.

A declarant and any dealer impliedly warrant that a unit and the common elements in the common interest community are suitable for the ordinary uses of real estate of its type and that any improvements made or contracted for by him or her, or made by any person before the creation of the common interest community, will be:

free from defective materials; and

constructed in accordance with applicable law, according to sound engineering and construction standards, and in a workerlike manner.

In addition, a declarant and any dealer warrant to a purchaser of a unit that may be used for residential use that an existing use, continuation of which is contemplated by the parties, does not violate applicable law at the time of conveyance or delivery of possession, whichever is earlier.

Warranties imposed by this section may be excluded or modified as specified in section 4-113 of this title.

For purposes of this section, improvements made or contracted for by an affiliate of a declarant are made or contracted for by the declarant.

A conveyance of a unit transfers to the purchaser all the declarant’s implied warranties of quality.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section, which is based upon Section 2-309 of ULTA, overturns the rule still applied in many States that a professional seller of real estate makes no implied warranties of quality (the rule of “caveat emptor”). In recent years, that rule has been increasingly recognized as a relic of an earlier age whose continued existence defeats reasonable expectations of purchasers. Since the 1930’s, more and more courts have completely or partially abolished the caveat emptor rule, and it is clear that the judicial tide is now running in favor of seller liability.

The principal warranty imposed under this section is that of suitability of both the unit and common elements for ordinary uses of real estate of similar type, and of quality of construction. Both of these warranties, which arise under subsection (b), are imposed only against declarants and dealers and not against unit owners selling their units to others.

Many recent cases have held that a seller of new housing impliedly warrants that the houses sold are habitable. The warranty of suitability under this Act is similar to the warranty of habitability. However, under the Act, the warranty of suitability applies to both units and common elements in both commercial and residential common interest communities. If, for example, a commercial unit is sold for commercial use and is not suitable for the ordinary uses of common interest community units of that type, the warranty of suitability has been breached. Moreover, this warranty of suitability arises in the case of used, as well as new, buildings or other improvements in the common interest community.

The warranty of suitability and of quality of construction arises only against a declarant and dealers. As in the case of sales of goods, a non-professional seller is liable, if at all, only the any express warranties made by him. However, if a non-professional seller fails to disclose defects of which he is aware, he may be liable to the purchaser for fraud or misrepresentation under the common law of the State where the transaction occurred. Also, the warranties imposed by this section may be used to give content to a general “guarantee” by a non-professional seller.

The warranty as to quality of construction for improvements made or contracted for by the declarant or made by any person before the creation of the common interest community is broader than the warranty of suitability. Particularly, it imposes liability for defects which may not be so serious as to render the units or common elements unsuitable for ordinary purposes of real estate of similar type. Moreover, subsection (e) prevents a declarant from avoiding liability with respect to the quality of construction warranty by having an affiliated entity make the desired improvements.

Under subsection (c), a declarant also warrants to a residential purchaser that an existing use contemplated by the parties does not violate applicable law. The declarant, therefore, is liable for any violation of housing codes or other laws which renders any existing use of the unit or common elements unlawful.

The issue of declarant liability for warranties is an important one in cases where a transfer of the declarant’s rights occurs, either as an arm’s length transaction, as a transfer to an affiliate, or as a transfer by foreclosure or a deed in lieu of foreclosure. Subsection (f) makes clear that a conveyance of a unit transfers to the purchaser all warranties of quality made by any declarant, and Section 3-104(b)(1) makes clear that the original declarant remains liable for all warranties of quality with respect to improvements made by him, even after he transfers all declarant rights, regardless of whether the unit is purchased from the declarant who made the improvements. If the successor declarant is an affiliate of the original declarant, it is clear, under both Sections 3-104(b)(2) and 4-114(f), that the original declarant remains liable for warranties of quality or improvements made by his successor even after the declarant himself ceases to have any special declarant rights.

As to the liabilities of successor declarants for warranties of quality, a successor who is an affiliate of a declarant is liable, pursuant to Section 3-104(e)(1), for warranties or improvements made by his predecessor. However, any non-affiliated successor of the original declarant is liable only for warranties of quality for improvements made or contracted for by him, and is not liable for warranties which may lie against the original declarant even if the successor sells units completed by the original declarant to a purchaser. See Section 3-104(e)(2). In the case of a foreclosing lender, this is the same result as that reached under Section 2-309(f) of ULTA. The same result is also reached under ULTA in the case of a successor who, under ULTA Section 3-309(b), would be a dealer since under that subsection the seller is liable only for warranties for improvements made or contracted for by him.

§ 4-115.
Exclusion or modification of implied warranties of quality.

Except as limited by subsection (b) of this section, with respect to a purchaser of a unit that may be used for residential use, implied warranties of quality:

may be excluded or modified by agreement of the parties; and

are excluded by express disclaimer, such as “as is,” “with all faults,” or other language that implies the exclusion of warranties.

With respect to a purchaser of a unit that may be occupied for residential use, no general disclaimer of implied warranties of quality is effective, but a declarant and any dealer may disclaim liability in an instrument signed by the purchaser for a specified defect or specified failure to comply with applicable law, if the defect or failure was a part of the basis of the bargain.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section parallels Section 2-311(b) and (c) of ULTA.

Under this section, implied warranties of quality may be disclaimed. However, a warranty disclaimer clause, like any other contract clause, is subject to a possible court holding of unconscionability. Although the section imposes no requirement that a disclaimer be in writing, except in the case of residential units, an oral disclaimer might be ineffective under the law of parole and extrinsic evidence.

Except as against purchasers of residential units, there are no formal standards for the effectiveness of a disclaimer clause. All that is necessary under this section is that the disclaimer be calculated to effectively notify the purchaser of the nature of the disclaimer.

Under subsection (b), general disclaimers of implied warranties are not permitted with respect to purchasers of residential units. However, a declarant may disclaim liability for a specified defect or a specified failure to comply with applicable law in an instrument signed by such a purchaser. The requirement that the disclaimer as to each defect or failure be in a signed instrument is designed to insure that the declarant sufficiently calls each defect or failure to the purchaser’s attention and that the purchaser has the opportunity to consider the effect of the particular defect or failure upon the bargain of the parties. Consequently, this section imposes a special burden upon the declarant who desires to make a “laundry list” of defects or failures by requiring him to emphasize each item on such a list and make its import clear to prospective purchasers. For example, the declarant of a conversion common interest community might, consistent with this subsection, disclaim certain warranties for “all electrical wiring and fixtures in the building, the furnace, all materials comprising or supporting the roof, and all components of the air conditioning system.”

This section is not intended to be inconsistent with, or to prevent, the use of insured warranty programs offered by some home builders. However, under the Act, the implied warranty that a new unit will be suitable for ordinary uses (i.e., habitable) and will be constructed in a sound, workmanlike manner, and free of defective materials, cannot be disclaimed by general language.

§ 4-116.
Statute of limitations for warranties.

Unless a period of limitation is tolled under section 3-111 of this title or affected by subsection (d) of this section, a judicial proceeding for breach of any obligation arising under section 4-113 or 4-114 of this title shall be commenced within six years after the cause of action accrues, but the parties may agree to reduce the period of limitation to not less than two years. An agreement to reduce the six-year period shall be evidenced by a separate instrument executed by the purchaser.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a cause of action for breach of warranty of quality, regardless of the purchaser’s lack of knowledge of the breach, accrues:

as to a unit, at the time the purchaser to whom the warranty is first made enters into possession if a possessory interest was conveyed or at the time of acceptance of the instrument of conveyance if a nonpossessory interest was conveyed; and

as to each common element, at the time the common element is completed or, if later, as to:

a common element that may be added to the common interest community or portion of it, at the time the first unit is conveyed to a bona fide purchaser; or

a common element within any other portion of the common interest community, at the time the first unit is conveyed to a bona fide purchaser.

If a warranty of quality explicitly extends to future performance or duration of any improvement or component of the common interest community, the cause of action accrues at the time the breach is discovered or at the end of the period for which the warranty explicitly extends, whichever is earlier.

During the period of declarant control, the association may authorize an independent committee of the executive board to evaluate and enforce by any lawful means warranty claims involving the common elements, and to compromise those claims. Only members of the executive board elected by unit owners other than the declarant and other persons appointed by those independent members may serve on the committee, and the committee’s decision must be free of any control by the declarant or any member of the executive board or officer appointed by the declarant. All costs reasonably incurred by the committee, including attorney’s fees, are common expenses, and must be added to the budget annually adopted by the association under section 3-115 of this title. If the committee is so created, the period of limitation for a warranty claim considered by the committee begins to run from the date of the first meeting of the committee.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 46, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 4-117.
Effect of violations on rights of action.

A declarant, association, unit owner, or any other person subject to this title may bring an action to enforce a right granted or obligation imposed by this title, the declaration, or the bylaws. The court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs.

Parties to a dispute arising under this title, the declaration, or the bylaws may agree to resolve the dispute by any form of binding or nonbinding alternative dispute resolution, but:

a declarant may agree with the association to do so only after the period of declarant control has expired unless the agreement is made with an independent committee of the executive board elected pursuant to subsection 4-116(d) of this title; and

an agreement to submit to any form of binding alternative dispute resolution must be in a record authenticated by the parties.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 47, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

Particular actions.

Trial court properly awarded attorney’s fees to appellees under the Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act’s fee provision. Appellees’ pursuit of relief resulted in a judicial determination contrary to the resolution sought by the condominium board of directors, and appellees prevailed on their claim rejecting a hybrid formula for assessment and in obtaining a “true-up” of assessments consistent with the reformation they proffered. Arapaho Owners Ass'n, Inc. v. Alpert, 2015 VT 93, 199 Vt. 553, 128 A.3d 397, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 69 (2015).

In awarding appellees attorney’s fees under the Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act, the trial court properly limited its award to $40,000, given the extensive litigation, the positions taken by both sides, the oddity of the situation faced by the condominium board of directors created years earlier by a phantom un-built unit, and the struggles of both sides and the trial court to resolve this situation. Arapaho Owners Ass'n, Inc. v. Alpert, 2015 VT 93, 199 Vt. 553, 128 A.3d 397, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 69 (2015).

Even if a development was a part of a common scheme development governed by the Vermont Uniform Common Interest Ownership Act, this did not give a water cooperative the right to charge the owner for water it did not receive. The trial court had construed a covenant to require the owner to provide only for water it received; by not challenging this point, the cooperative had conceded that the owner had not violated the covenant. 171234 Canada Inc. v. AHA Water Coop., 2008 VT 115, 184 Vt. 633, 968 A.2d 303, 2008 Vt. LEXIS 142 (2008) (mem.).

§ 4-118.
Labeling of promotional material.

No promotional material may be displayed or delivered to prospective purchasers which describes an improvement which is not in existence unless the description of the improvement in the promotional material is conspicuously labeled or identified either as “must be built” or as “need not be built.”

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section requiring the labeling of improvements depicted on promotional material is necessary to assure that purchasers are not deceived with respect to improvements the declarant indicates he intends to make in a common interest community.

§ 4-119.
Declarant’s obligation to complete and restore.

Unless an improvement is labeled “need not be built,” the declarant shall complete all improvements depicted on any site plan or other graphic representation, if the site plan or other graphic representation is contained in the public offering statement or in any promotional material distributed by or for the declarant.

The declarant is subject to liability for the prompt repair and restoration, to a condition compatible with the remainder of the common interest community, of any portion of the common interest community affected by the exercise of rights reserved pursuant to or created by section 2-110, 2-111, 2-112, 2-113, 2-115, or 2-116 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The duty imposed by subsection (a) is a fundamental obligation of the declarant and is one with which a successor declarant is obligated to comply under Section 3-104.

Section 4-119(b) requires the declarant to repair and restore the common interest community following the exercise of any rights reserved or created to exercise a development right (Section 2-110), to alter units (Section 2-112), relocate the boundaries between adjoining units (Section 2-112), subdivide units (Section 2-113), use units or common elements for sales purposes (Section 2-115), or exercise of easement rights (Section 2-116). Plainly, this obligation on the declarant exists only if the declarant, in his capacity as a unit owner, exercises these rights. If any right to, for example, alter units, is exercised by another unit owner, that unit owner and not the declarant, would be responsible for the consequences of those acts.

§ 4-120.
Substantial completion of units.

If delivery of a public offering statement is required for the sale of a unit, a contract of sale may be executed, but interest in that unit shall be conveyed only after the declaration is recorded and the unit is substantially completed, as evidenced by a recorded certificate of substantial completion executed by an independent architect, professional surveyor, or engineer, or by issuance of a certificate of occupancy.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The purpose of this section, complemented by Section 4-110, is to assure that the declarant is not able to obtain use of the purchaser’s money until the purchaser is able to get a completed unit.